North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-40.6 Emergency Services Communication Systems
57-40.6-12.
Emergency services communications coordinating committee — Membership — Duties.

The governing body of a city or county, which adopted a fee on assessed communications services under this chapter, shall make a report of the income, expenditures, and status of its emergency services communication system. The report must be submitted to the emergency services communications coordinating committee in the format requested by the committee. The committee is composed of four members, one appointed by the North Dakota 911 association, one appointed by the North Dakota association of counties, one appointed by the chief information officer of the state, and one appointed by the adjutant general to represent the division of state radio.

The committee shall:

Recommend to the legislative management changes to the operating standards for emergency services communications, including training or certification standards for dispatchers;

Develop guidelines regarding the allowable uses of the fee revenue collected under this chapter;

Biennially, request, receive, and compile reports from each governing body on the use of the proceeds of the fee imposed under this chapter, analyze the reports with respect to the guidelines, file its report with the legislative council by November first of each even-numbered year regarding the use of the fee revenue, and recommend to the legislative assembly the appropriate maximum fee allowed by section 57-40.6-02;

Periodically evaluate chapter 57-40.6 and recommend changes to the legislative management; and

Serve as the governmental body to coordinate plans for implementing emergency 911 services and internet protocol enabled emergency applications for 911.

The committee may initiate and administer statewide agreements among the governing bodies of the local governmental units with jurisdiction over an emergency 911 telephone system to coordinate the procurement of equipment and services, fund the research, administration, and activities of the committee, and contract for the necessary staff support for committee activities.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 545, § 9; 2005, ch. 16, § 31; 2007, ch. 535, § 9; 2009, ch. 482, § 92; 2009, ch. 570, § 1; 2021, ch. 479, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Validity, Construction, and Application of Sales, Use, and Utility Taxes on Retail Transactions of Internet Sellers and Internet Access Providers. 30 A.L.R.6th 341.

57-40.6-13.
Provision of call location information by wireless service provider or prepaid wireless service provider or seller to law enforcement.

Upon request of a law enforcement agency or a public safety answering point on behalf of a law enforcement agency, a wireless service provider shall provide call location information concerning the telecommunications device of a user to the requesting law enforcement agency or public safety answering point. A prepaid wireless service provider or seller shall provide such call location information if available. A law enforcement agency or public safety answering point may not request information under this section unless for the purposes of responding to a call for emergency services or in an emergency situation that involves the risk of death or serious physical harm.

A wireless service provider or prepaid wireless service provider or seller may establish protocols by which the carrier voluntarily discloses call location information.

A claim for relief may not be brought in any court against any wireless service provider, prepaid wireless service provider or seller, or any other person for providing call location information if acting in good faith and under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 480, § 1; 2013, ch. 468, § 7; 2021, ch. 479, § 8, effective July 1, 2021.

57-40.6-14.
Prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee.

There is imposed a prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee of two and one-half percent on the gross receipts of sellers from all sales at retail of prepaid wireless services in this state.

A retail transaction that is made, in person, by a consumer at a business location of the seller shall be treated as occurring in this state if that business location is in this state. Any other retail transaction shall be treated as occurring in this state if the retail transaction is treated as occurring in this state under the provisions of chapter 57-39.4 as those provisions apply to a prepaid wireless calling service.

Prepaid wireless emergency 911 fees collected by sellers shall be remitted to the commissioner.

An entity required to collect and remit the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee shall register with the commissioner. The registration shall be made in the form prescribed by the commissioner, in which the registrant shall identify the name under which the registrant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of the business, the federal identification number, and other information as the commissioner may require.

Gross receipts from sales at retail of prepaid wireless services are exempt from the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee imposed by this section when the sale is made to a person entitled to a sales and use tax exemption under subsection 6 or 12 of section 57-39.2-04.

The prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee shall be collected by the seller from the consumer. The amount of the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee shall be either separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the consumer by the seller, or otherwise disclosed to the consumer.

The prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee is the liability of the consumer and not of the seller or any provider, except that the seller shall be liable to remit all prepaid wireless emergency 911 fees the seller collects from the consumer, including all fees the seller is deemed to collect when the amount of the fee has not been separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer by the seller.

If the amount of the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee imposed by this section is separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer, the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee may not be included in the base for measuring any other tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by this state, any political subdivision of this state, or any intergovernmental agency.

When prepaid wireless service is sold with one or more other products or services for a single, nonitemized price, then the percentage specified in subsection 1 shall apply to the entire nonitemized price unless the seller elects to apply the percentage to:

The amount of the prepaid wireless service that is disclosed to the consumer as a dollar amount, including the fee imposed by this section; or

The seller identifies the portion of the price that is attributable to the prepaid wireless service by reasonable and verifiable standards from its books and records that are kept in the regular course of business.

If a minimal amount of prepaid wireless service is sold with a prepaid wireless device for a single, nonitemized price, then the seller may elect not to apply the percentage specified in subsection 1. For purposes of this subsection, an amount of service denominated as ten minutes or less, or five dollars or less, is minimal.

The provisions of chapter 57-39.2, pertaining to the administration of the retail sales tax, including provisions for audit, refunds, credits, or rules, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, govern the administration of the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee imposed in this chapter.

A seller must complete a prepaid emergency 911 fee return reporting the gross receipts of the seller for prepaid wireless services sold, the amount of the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee for the period covered by the return, and any other information the commissioner may require to enable the seller to correctly compute and collect the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee.

If the seller is a retailer under chapter 57-39.2, the seller may file the prepaid emergency 911 fee return and pay the fees due at the same time the sales and use tax is due under section 57-39.2-11 or 57-39.2-12.

The seller required to collect, report, and remit the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee imposed under this section may retain three percent of the fee.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 468, § 4; 2017, ch. 247, § 5, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 479, § 9, effective July 1, 2021.

57-40.6-15.
Prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee fund.

All fees, penalties, and other charges collected under section 57-40.6-14 must be paid to the commissioner in the form of a remittance payable to the commissioner. The commissioner shall transmit the fees collected monthly to the state treasurer to be credited to a special fund in the state treasury, to be known as the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee fund. The state treasurer, no less than quarterly, shall pay over the moneys accumulated in the fund to the governing joint powers entity established pursuant to chapter 54-40.3 for the specific purpose of implementing emergency services communications systems for the state’s political subdivisions. The proceeds from the prepaid wireless emergency 911 fee shall be used specifically for the implementation, maintenance, or operation of the emergency services communication system.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 468, § 5.